Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202619-5708
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Economic Development may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Municipality Infrastructure Aid Act.

Laws 2024, LB600, § 8.